src/filters/reorder-tags.est.xfscript
# move (usage-related) tags to the right end, and 
# if there are more than one, keep the most informative one
# moving algorithm from Karttunen, Beesley "2-level rule compiler" 4.3 (via Mans Hulden via Francis Tyers) 

define RTag [ "+Usage/Rare" ] ;          # norm, but rare 
define HTag [ "+Usage/Hyp" ] ;           # norm, but so rare that norm is probaly wrong
define NTag [ "+Usage/NotNorm" ] ;       # not norm, but sometimes used
define CTag [ "+Usage/CommonNotNorm" ] ; # not norm, and used more than norm
define ETag [ "+Emph" ] ;              # emphasized form (mina, sina, tema, meie, teie, nemad) 

define MoveR [  [..] -> RTag || RTag ?* _ .#. .o. RTag -> 0 || _ ?* RTag .#. ];
define MoveH [  [..] -> HTag || HTag ?* _ .#. .o. HTag -> 0 || _ ?* HTag .#. ];
define MoveN [  [..] -> NTag || NTag ?* _ .#. .o. NTag -> 0 || _ ?* NTag .#. ];
define MoveC [  [..] -> CTag || CTag ?* _ .#. .o. CTag -> 0 || _ ?* CTag .#. ];
define MoveE [  [..] -> ETag || ETag ?* _ .#. .o. ETag -> 0 || _ ?* ETag .#. ];

# move usage-related tag to the right end of the word
define MoveFirstTag [MoveR .o. MoveH .o. MoveN .o. MoveC] ;
# ... and the Emph tag to the end...
define MoveTag [MoveFirstTag .o. MoveE] ;

# if 2 usage-related tags are adjacent, remove one (preferably the less informative one)
# the order of the tags is determined by the order in MoveFirstTag:
# RTag HTag NTag CTag ETag
# two similar tags never co-occur (because MoveFirstTag deletes one of them)

define RemRTag RTag -> 0 || _ [HTag | NTag | CTag] ; # 
define RemHTag HTag -> 0 || _ [NTag | CTag]  ; # 
define RemNTag NTag -> 0 || _ [CTag] ; # 


define RemTag [RemRTag .o. RemHTag .o. RemNTag] ; 

regex  [MoveTag .o. RemTag].i ;

# this script is also applicable to wordpairs with inflecting parts (emb-kumb, kihin-kahin) that 
# get usage-related tags initially for both words;
# but only one tag should be left in the end.
